Ohio, session 136, SB455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.156 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.156. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the westbound and eastbound lanes of interstate route number seventy between the main street and Bexley exit and the Miller avenue and Kelton avenue exit, within Franklin county, shall be known as the "Col. George A. Martin Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.